Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 4. Registration and Recognition of Orders From Other States

§
3-8-401.
Registration of guardianship orders.

If a guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a guardian is not pending in this state, the guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate county of this state, certified copies of the order and letters of office.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
3-8-402.
Registration of protective orders.

If a conservator has been appointed in another state and a petition for a protective order is not pending in this state, the conservator appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the protective order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court of this state, in any county in which property belonging to the protected person is located, certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
3-8-403.
Effect of registration.

Upon registration of a guardianship or protective order from another state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in this state all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this state, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and, if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

A court of this state may grant any relief available under this act and other law of this state to enforce a registered order.

Any court in this state issuing a guardianship or protective order pursuant to this act may require the guardian or conservator to file a certified copy of any report or accounting the guardian or conservator files with the court.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.